cs: Reliéfní styl: 3D tištěný; Ploché; Členité oceánské dno; Vyvýšené; Jiné
fr: Style de relief: Impression 3D; Plate; Fond océanique en creux; Surélevé; Autre
pl: Typ rzeźby: Druk 3D; Płaskie; Relief z wgłębionym dnem oceanu; Wypukły relief; Inne
en: Relief style: 3D printed; Flat; Indented ocean floor; Raised relief; Other
bg-BG: Стил на релефа: 3D отпечатано; Плоско; Вдлъбнато океанско дъно; Изпъкнал релеф; Друго
nl: Reliëfstijl: 3D-geprint; Vlak; Ingekerfde oceaanbodem; Reliëf; Overig
ja: レリーフのスタイル: 3Dプリント; フラット; 陥没した海底; 浮彫; その他
zh-TW: 地勢風格: 3D 列印; 平穩; 鋸齒海底; 加強緩解; 其他
pt-BR: Estilo de relevo: Impresso em 3D; Plana; Fundo oceânico rebaixado; Alto-relevo; Outro
de: Reliefstil: 3D-gedruckt; Flach; Eingeschnittener Meeresboden; Erhabenes Relief; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Reljefo tipas: 3D spausdinimas; Plokščias; Įdubęs vandenyno dugnas; Iškilus reljefas; Kita
sk-SK: Typ reliéfu: Vytlačené 3D; Ploché; Členité oceánske dno; Zvýšený reliéf; Iné
nb: Relieffstil: 3D-printet; Flat; Innrykket havbunn; Hevet relieff; Annet
it: Stile del rilievo: Stampato in 3D; Piatto; fondale oceanico frastagliato; In rilievo; Altro
sl-SI: Reliefni slog: 3D-natisnjeno; Ploščata; Razčlenjeno oceansko dno; Izbočeni relief; Druga
pt-PT: Estilo de relevo: Impresso em 3D; Plano; Fundo oceânico recortado; Relevo elevado; Outro
ko: 부조 스타일: 3D 프린팅; 플랫; 음각 해저 지형; 돌출형 입형; 기타
fi: Reliefityyli: 3D-tulostettu; Tasainen; Uurteinen merenpohja; Kohokuvio; Muu
zh-CN: 地形风格: 3D 打印; 平面; 凹陷海底; 浮雕; 其他
sv: Reliefstil: 3D-utskrivet; Platt; Indragen havsbotten; upphöjd relief; Övrigt
hr-HR: Stil reljefa: 3D ispis; Ravna; Udubljeni reljef morskog dna; Uzdignuti reljef; Ostalo
el: Στυλ ανάγλυφης επιφάνειας: τρισδιάστατα εκτυπωμένο; Επίπεδο; Εσοχή στον πυθμένα του ωκεανού; Ανάγλυφο; Άλλο
ro-RO: Stilul reliefului: Imprimat 3D; Plat; Fund oceanic adâncit; Relief ridicat; Altele
tr: Kabartma stili: 3D baskı; Düz; Girintili okyanus tabanı; Kabartmalı; Diğer
da: Reliefstil: 3D-printet; Flad; Indskåren havbund; Raised relief; Andet
es: Estilo de relieve: Impreso en 3D; Puro; Fondo oceánico intencionado; Alivio elevado; Otros
hu: Dombormű stílus: 3D nyomtatott; Sík; Bemélyedt óceánfenék; Domborzat; Egyéb
th: รูปแบบภาพนูนต่ำ: การพิมพ์ 3 มิติ; แบบแบน; พื้นมหาสมุทรที่มีรอยยุบหรือรอยเว้า; บรรเทาปวด; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип рельефа: 3D-печать; Гладкий; Изрезанное дно океана; Выпуклый; Другое
vi: Kiểu phù điêu: In 3D; Phẳng; Đáy đại dương lõm; Phù điêu nổi; Khác